tools/fst/alternation-rules.xfst
# Author: Leonel F. de Alencar, leonel.de.alencar@ufc.br, Federal University of Ceará
# Date: April 27, 2018, bug corrections February 17, 2020

# Implementation of diminutive formation in Portuguese in the paradigm 
# of finite-state morphology (Beesley & Karttunen 2003)

# Script for compiling a finite-state transducer modeling
# orthographic and morphophonological alternation rules
# in Portuguese, e.g "manga" => "manguinha" (diminutive of 'mango'),
# "rapazes" => "rapazezinhos" (diminutive of 'boy' in plural)

# This script runs in both Foma and XFST. It compiles a cascade
# of finite-state transducers modeling different alternation rules
# in Portuguese. Most of these rules apply to other derivational
# processes in Portuguese. The individual transducers are composed 
# into a single transducer encoding all alternation rules.

# Defining a marker for words with stems ending in s, 
# e.g. "lápis", "burguês", etc. In these words,
# z of -zinho suffix is deleted after a stemm's s,
# e. g. "lapisinho", "burguesinhos". In other cases,
# the suffix form is preserved, e.g. "burguesezinhos".
# This marker is just an implementational device which
# distinguishes this word type from superficially similar cases 
# where a final s represents the plural morpheme. 
# Differently than a stemm's s, a plural s is deleted when the zinho
# suffix is attached, e.g. "rapazes" => "rapazezinhos".
define StemmS %$;

# delete this marker
define DelStemmS StemmS -> 0 ;

# right context defining a non-final hyphen-separated compound member
define Hyph [$"-"] ;

# protect accents in non-final hyphen-separated compound members from being removed by Unaccent rule
define Protect [
		       [á -> A§ || _ Hyph ] 
       	       	   .o. [é -> E§ || _ Hyph ] 
       	       	   .o. [ê -> E¢ || _ Hyph] 
       	       	   .o. [ó -> O§ || _ Hyph]
       		   .o. [ô -> O¢ || _ Hyph] 
		   .o. [í -> I§ || _ Hyph] 
		   .o. [ú -> U§ || _ Hyph]
		   .o. [â -> A¢ || _ Hyph]
		   ];

# convert protected letters back into accented letters
define Reconv [[á -> A§  ] 
       	       	   .o. [ E§ -> é ] 
       	       	   .o. [ E¢ -> ê ] 
       	       	   .o. [ O§ -> ó ]
       		   .o. [ O¢ -> ô ] 
		   .o. [ I§ -> í ] 
		   .o. [ U§ -> ú ]
		   .o. [ A¢ -> â ]];

# anterior vowels
define AntVow [ e | i ] ;

# posterior vowels
define PostVow [ a | o | u ] ;

# vowels
define Vow [ AntVow | PostVow ] ;

# morpheme separator
define MorphSep %^ ;

# thematic vowels
define ThemVow [ a | e | o ] ;

# convert letter c to phone [s] to prevent rule ChangeC
# from applying in cases like face^inha (diminitive of face)
define PhonC [c -> %[ s %] || _ AntVow MorphSep  ]  ;

# convett back phone [s] to letter c
define OrthC %[ s %] -> c ;


# convert letter g to phone [Z] (SAMPA code for the voiced
# postalveolar fricative [ʒ] in IPA) to prevent rule ChangeG
# from applying in cases like herege^inha (diminitive of herege)
define PhonG [g -> %[ Z %] || _ AntVow MorphSep  ]  ;

# convett back phone [Z] to letter g
define OrthG %[ Z %] -> g ;

# delete ç before morpheme separator and anterior vowel
define DeleteCedilla  [ ç -> c || _ MorphSep AntVow ];

# convert m to n before all letters except p or b
define NasalBilabAssim m -> n || _ MorphSep \[p|b];

# delete thematic vowel before morpheme separator and vowel
# casa^inha => cas^inha (diminutive of house)
define ThemVowDel ThemVow -> 0 || _ MorphSep Vow ;

# Note that the mapping examples used throughout these comments are simplified, 
# they should help grasping the functioning of the different alternation rules. 
# They don't correspond to the actual intermediate strings generated
# by the lexicon transducer.

# faca^inha => fac^inha => faqu^inha (diminutive of knife)
define ChangeC c -> {qu} || _ MorphSep AntVow ;

# manga^inha => mang^inha => mangu^inha (diminutive of mango)
define ChangeG g -> {gu} || _ MorphSep AntVow ;

# optionally delete thematic vowel e in the plural of 
# words with the stem ending in s or z, 
# e.g. luzes^zinhas  (diminutive of "luz" 'light' in plural)
# luzes^zinhas => luzs^zinhas
define OptDelEStemZ e (->) 0 || [z | s] _ s MorphSep z ;

# optionally delete  thematic vowel e  in the plural of 
# words with the stem ending in r, 
# e.g. flores^zinhas  (diminutive of "flor" 'flower' in plural)
# flores^zinhas => flors^zinhas
define OptDelEStemR e (->) 0 || Vow r _ s MorphSep z ;

# TODO: abdômen => abdômenes => abdomenezinhos
# => abdomenzinhos

# composing the two previous rules in one single FST
define OptDelE OptDelEStemZ .o. OptDelEStemR ;

# luzes^zinhas => luze^zinhas
# burgueses^zinhos => burguese^zinhos
define PluralSDeletion s  -> 0 || _ MorphSep z ;

# luz^zinhas => luz^inhas
# lápis$^zinho => lápis$^inho
# burguês$^zinho => burguês$^inho
# burgues^zinhos => burgues^inhos
define SuffZDeletion z-> 0 || [z|s] (StemmS) MorphSep _ ;

# ideia^inha => idei^inha => ide^inha (diminutive of idea)
define IDeletion i-> 0 || _ MorphSep i ;
 
# delete morpheme separator
define DeleteMorphSep MorphSep -> 0 ;

# remove accents (diacritics marking stress) from derived words
define Unaccent [[á -> a] .o. [é -> e] .o. [ê -> e] .o. [ó -> o]
       		       	     	.o. [ô -> o] .o. [í -> i] .o. [ú -> u]
				.o. [â -> a ]];

# compose the cascade of alternation rules in one single transducer
define AltRules NasalBilabAssim .o. 
       				PhonC
				.o.
				PhonG
				.o.
       				ThemVowDel 
				.o. 
				ChangeC 
				.o.
				OrthC
				.o.
				ChangeG
				.o.
				OrthG
				.o.
				OptDelE
				.o.
				PluralSDeletion 
				.o.
				SuffZDeletion
				.o.
				Protect
				.o.
				IDeletion
				.o.
				Unaccent
				.o.
				Reconv
				.o.
				DeleteCedilla
				.o.
				DelStemmS
				.o.
				DeleteMorphSep ;

# convert abstract morpheme representation +DIM to inh suffix
# before thematic vowel, e.g.:
# casa^+DIM^a => cas^inh^a (diminutive of house)
# exepting cases where the thematic vowel is preceded by ã or õ, e.g.:
# pão => pão^+DIM^o => *pão^inh^o  (diminutive of bread)
define RealizeDim [ %+DIM -> {^inh} || \[ã|õ] ThemVow _ ] ;

# remove paths with +DIM in the transducer's lower language
define Filter ~ [$ %+DIM ] ;
# This prevents generation (and analysis) of ungrammatical forms like 
# *cafeinho (cafezinho, diminutive of coffee), *pãinho (pãozinho),
# *marinho (marzinho, diminutive of sea), *papelinho (papelzinho, 
# diminutive of paper), etc. This is subject to some dialectal variation,
# e.g. casalinho (diminutive of couple or town), which occurs in European Portuguese
# (Villalva & Silvestre 2014:120), and mulherinha (diminutive of woman), 
# which is used by some speakers of Brazilian Portuguese. These forms
# can be generated by changing the left context of the RealizeDim rule.
